Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 18. Alzheimer’s Disease.

§ 32.1-73.13.
Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias; early detection and diagnosis; risk reduction and care planning.

Using such funds as may be available for such purpose, the Department, in consultation with the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, shall have the lead responsibility for (i) educating and informing the public, based on evidence-based public health research and data, about Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias; (ii) supporting early detection and diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias; (iii) reducing the risk of potentially avoidable hospitalizations for individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias; (iv) reducing the risk of cognitive decline and cognitive impairment associated with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias; and (v) supporting care planning and management for individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias. The Department shall use targeted strategies specific to the needs of persons with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias. The Department shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies, private and public agencies, and other interested persons in order to address and reduce the risks and impairments associated with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias within the Commonwealth.

The provisions of this section shall not limit the powers and duties of other state agencies.

History.

2020, c. 854.